New York, session 2025-2026, A5833.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 56 of the state finance law, as 2 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 1986, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Whenever in [his] the comptroller's opinion it is to the advantage 5 of the state the comptroller when issuing and selling any bonds of the 6 state may reserve to the state on such conditions as [he] the comp- 7 troller may deem advisable and proper the privilege of refunding or of 8 redeeming [at not more than three per centum above par value] all or any 9 part of such bonds prior to the date on which they shall be due and 10 payable. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07030-01-5